Hawaii statutes.
§706-660.2 Sentence of imprisonment
for offenses against children, elder persons, or handicapped persons. (1)
Notwithstanding section 706-669, if not subjected to an extended term of
imprisonment pursuant to section 706-662, a person shall be sentenced to a
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment without possibility of parole as
provided in subsection (2) if:

(a) The person, in the course of committing or
attempting to commit a felony, causes the death or inflicts serious or
substantial bodily injury upon another person who is:

(i) Sixty years of age or older;

(ii) Blind, a paraplegic, or a quadriplegic;
or

(iii) Eight years of age or younger; and

(b) Such disability is known or reasonably should be
known to the defendant.

(2) The term of imprisonment for a person
sentenced pursuant to subsection (1) shall be as follows:

(a) For murder in the second degree--fifteen years;

(b) For a class A felony--six years, eight months;

(c) For a class B felony--three years, four months;

(d) For a class C felony--one year, eight months. [L
1988, c 89, §1; am L 1990, c 67, §8; am L 2015, c 35, §22]

COMMENTARY ON §706-660.2

Act 89, Session Laws 1988, added this section to mandate
harsher penalties for crimes against victims who are less able to protect themselves.
The legislature found that passage of this section will afford a greater
measure of protection for the groups designated in this section. House
Standing Committee Report No. 459-88, Senate Standing Committee Report No.
2544.

Act 35, Session Laws 2015, amended this section by adding
subsection designations and making other technical nonsubstantive amendments.

Case Notes

No error in sentence of life imprisonment with a mandatory
minimum term of fifteen years for attempted second degree murder of infant by
abandonment where defendant left infant in danger of death by reason of
exposure or accident. 73 H. 109, 831 P.2d 512 (1992).

Determination that a defendant is within the class of
offenders to which this section applies to be made by sentencing court after
defendant's adjudication of guilt at trial by the trier of fact. 82 H. 304,
922 P.2d 358 (1996).

As an attempt to commit a crime is an offense of the same
class and grade as the offense which is attempted, and second degree murder committed
under the "aggravated circumstances" set forth in this section is
expressly distinguished from classified felonies and, pursuant to §706-610,
from unclassified felonies; thus, attempted second degree murder is not an "unclassified"
offense for purposes of sentencing and is not treated as a class C felony
pursuant to this section. 96 H. 17, 25 P.3d 792 (2001).

Failure to instruct the jury to determine whether infant
victim was under the age of eight and whether defendant knew it, or should have
known it, was harmless beyond a reasonable doubt; omitted sentencing factor was
supported by uncontroverted evidence, including defendant's admission, that
defendant's infant daughter was under the age of eight. 96 H. 17, 25 P.3d 792
(2001).

As defendant could only be sentenced under the options
available for the offense for which defendant was convicted, defendant had only
pled guilty to and was convicted of the offense of assault in the first degree,
and plea was devoid of reference to all necessary aggravating circumstances,
trial court erred in resentencing defendant to an indeterminate ten-year
sentence with a mandatory minimum term of three years and four months under
this section. 93 H. 189 (App.), 998 P.2d 70 (2000).

Where aggravating circumstance of complainant's age was not
set forth in the plea agreement or admitted or stipulated to as part of the
guilty plea, there was an insufficient factual basis in the accepted guilty
plea to support the mandatory prison term under this section. 93 H. 189 (App.),
998 P.2d 70 (2000).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next